Illinois, session 104th, HB1867.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-172 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-172)7    Sec. 15-172. Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze 8Homestead Exemption. 9    (a) This Section may be cited as the Low-Income Senior 10Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead Exemption.11    (b) As used in this Section:12    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an 13application under this Section.14    "Base amount" means the base year equalized assessed value 15of the residence plus the first year's equalized assessed 16value of any added improvements which increased the assessed 17value of the residence after the base year.18    "Base year" means the taxable year prior to the taxable 19year for which the applicant first qualifies and applies for 20the exemption provided that in the prior taxable year the 21property was improved with a permanent structure that was 22occupied as a residence by the applicant who was liable for 23paying real property taxes on the property and who was either   HB1867- 2 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1(i) an owner of record of the property or had legal or 2equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a written 3instrument or (ii) had a legal or equitable interest as a 4lessee in the parcel of property that was single family 5residence. If in any subsequent taxable year for which the 6applicant applies and qualifies for the exemption the 7equalized assessed value of the residence is less than the 8equalized assessed value in the existing base year (provided 9that such equalized assessed value is not based on an assessed 10value that results from a temporary irregularity in the 11property that reduces the assessed value for one or more 12taxable years), then that subsequent taxable year shall become 13the base year until a new base year is established under the 14terms of this paragraph. For taxable year 1999 only, the Chief 15County Assessment Officer shall review (i) all taxable years 16for which the applicant applied and qualified for the 17exemption and (ii) the existing base year. The assessment 18officer shall select as the new base year the year with the 19lowest equalized assessed value. An equalized assessed value 20that is based on an assessed value that results from a 21temporary irregularity in the property that reduces the 22assessed value for one or more taxable years shall not be 23considered the lowest equalized assessed value. The selected 24year shall be the base year for taxable year 1999 and 25thereafter until a new base year is established under the 26terms of this paragraph.  HB1867- 3 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1    "Chief County Assessment Officer" means the County 2Assessor or Supervisor of Assessments of the county in which 3the property is located.4    "Equalized assessed value" means the assessed value as 5equalized by the Illinois Department of Revenue.6    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the 7applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 8applicant as their principal place of residence.9    "Household income" means the combined income of the 10members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 11taxable year.12    "Income" has the same meaning as provided in Section 3.07 13of the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property 14Tax Relief Act, except that, beginning in assessment year 152001, "income" does not include veteran's benefits.16    "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" means the United States 17Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws 18relating to federal income taxes in effect for the year 19preceding the taxable year.20    "Life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative" means 21a facility as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities 22Act.23    "Maximum income limitation" means:24        (1) $35,000 prior to taxable year 1999;25        (2) $40,000 in taxable years 1999 through 2003;26        (3) $45,000 in taxable years 2004 through 2005;  HB1867- 4 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1        (4) $50,000 in taxable years 2006 and 2007;2        (5) $55,000 in taxable years 2008 through 2016; 3        (6) for taxable year 2017, (i) $65,000 for qualified 4    property located in a county with 3,000,000 or more 5    inhabitants and (ii) $55,000 for qualified property 6    located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; 7    and 8        (7) for taxable years 2018 through 2025 and 9    thereafter, $65,000 for all qualified property; and . 10        (8) for taxable years 2026 and thereafter, the maximum 11    income limitation for the immediately preceding taxable 12    year, increased by the annual cost of living increase, if 13    any, in Social Security and Supplemental Security Income 14    benefits that took effect during the immediately preceding 15    calendar year. On or before February 1 of the taxable year 16    in which the increase in the maximum income limitation 17    under this item (8) takes place, the Department of Revenue 18    shall calculate the new maximum income limitation and 19    publish that amount on its website. 20    As an alternative income valuation, a homeowner who is 21enrolled in any of the following programs may be presumed to 22have household income that does not exceed the maximum income 23limitation for that tax year as required by this Section: Aid 24to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) Program or the 25Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), both of 26which are administered by the Department of Human Services;   HB1867- 5 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), which 2is administered by the Department of Commerce and Economic 3Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is administered 4by the Department on Aging; and the Senior Citizens Real 5Estate Tax Deferral Program. 6    A chief county assessment officer may indicate that he or 7she has verified an applicant's income eligibility for this 8exemption but may not report which program or programs, if 9any, enroll the applicant. Release of personal information 10submitted pursuant to this Section shall be deemed an 11unwarranted invasion of personal privacy under the Freedom of 12Information Act. 13    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place and 14appurtenant structures used for residential purposes in this 15State occupied on January 1 of the taxable year by a household 16and so much of the surrounding land, constituting the parcel 17upon which the dwelling place is situated, as is used for 18residential purposes. If the Chief County Assessment Officer 19has established a specific legal description for a portion of 20property constituting the residence, then that portion of 21property shall be deemed the residence for the purposes of 22this Section.23    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 24valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are 25levied.26    (c) Beginning in taxable year 1994, a low-income senior   HB1867- 6 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1citizens assessment freeze homestead exemption is granted for 2real property that is improved with a permanent structure that 3is occupied as a residence by an applicant who (i) is 65 years 4of age or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household 5income that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, 6(iii) is liable for paying real property taxes on the 7property, and (iv) is an owner of record of the property or has 8a legal or equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a 9written instrument. This homestead exemption shall also apply 10to a leasehold interest in a parcel of property improved with a 11permanent structure that is a single family residence that is 12occupied as a residence by a person who (i) is 65 years of age 13or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household income 14that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) has 15a legal or equitable ownership interest in the property as 16lessee, and (iv) is liable for the payment of real property 17taxes on that property. 18    In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the amount 19of the exemption for all taxable years is the equalized 20assessed value of the residence in the taxable year for which 21application is made minus the base amount. In all other 22counties, the amount of the exemption is as follows: (i) 23through taxable year 2005 and for taxable year 2007 and 24thereafter, the amount of this exemption shall be the 25equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable year 26for which application is made minus the base amount; and (ii)   HB1867- 7 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1for taxable year 2006, the amount of the exemption is as 2follows:3        (1) For an applicant who has a household income of 4    $45,000 or less, the amount of the exemption is the 5    equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable 6    year for which application is made minus the base amount.7        (2) For an applicant who has a household income 8    exceeding $45,000 but not exceeding $46,250, the amount of 9    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 10    residence in the taxable year for which application is 11    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.8.12        (3) For an applicant who has a household income 13    exceeding $46,250 but not exceeding $47,500, the amount of 14    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 15    residence in the taxable year for which application is 16    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.6.17        (4) For an applicant who has a household income 18    exceeding $47,500 but not exceeding $48,750, the amount of 19    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 20    residence in the taxable year for which application is 21    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.4.22        (5) For an applicant who has a household income 23    exceeding $48,750 but not exceeding $50,000, the amount of 24    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 25    residence in the taxable year for which application is 26    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.2.   HB1867- 8 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1    When the applicant is a surviving spouse of an applicant 2for a prior year for the same residence for which an exemption 3under this Section has been granted, the base year and base 4amount for that residence are the same as for the applicant for 5the prior year.6    Each year at the time the assessment books are certified 7to the County Clerk, the Board of Review or Board of Appeals 8shall give to the County Clerk a list of the assessed values of 9improvements on each parcel qualifying for this exemption that 10were added after the base year for this parcel and that 11increased the assessed value of the property.12    In the case of land improved with an apartment building 13owned and operated as a cooperative or a building that is a 14life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative, the 15maximum reduction from the equalized assessed value of the 16property is limited to the sum of the reductions calculated 17for each unit occupied as a residence by a person or persons 18(i) 65 years of age or older, (ii) with a household income that 19does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) who is 20liable, by contract with the owner or owners of record, for 21paying real property taxes on the property, and (iv) who is an 22owner of record of a legal or equitable interest in the 23cooperative apartment building, other than a leasehold 24interest. In the instance of a cooperative where a homestead 25exemption has been granted under this Section, the cooperative 26association or its management firm shall credit the savings   HB1867- 9 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1resulting from that exemption only to the apportioned tax 2liability of the owner who qualified for the exemption. Any 3person who willfully refuses to credit that savings to an 4owner who qualifies for the exemption is guilty of a Class B 5misdemeanor.6    When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 7Section and an applicant then becomes a resident of a facility 8licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 9Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 10Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 11the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall be granted in subsequent 12years so long as the residence (i) continues to be occupied by 13the qualified applicant's spouse or (ii) if remaining 14unoccupied, is still owned by the qualified applicant for the 15homestead exemption.16    Beginning January 1, 1997, when an individual dies who 17would have qualified for an exemption under this Section, and 18the surviving spouse does not independently qualify for this 19exemption because of age, the exemption under this Section 20shall be granted to the surviving spouse for the taxable year 21preceding and the taxable year of the death, provided that, 22except for age, the surviving spouse meets all other 23qualifications for the granting of this exemption for those 24years.25    When married persons maintain separate residences, the 26exemption provided for in this Section may be claimed by only   HB1867- 10 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1one of such persons and for only one residence.2    For taxable year 1994 only, in counties having less than 33,000,000 inhabitants, to receive the exemption, a person 4shall submit an application by February 15, 1995 to the Chief 5County Assessment Officer of the county in which the property 6is located. In counties having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 7for taxable year 1994 and all subsequent taxable years, to 8receive the exemption, a person may submit an application to 9the Chief County Assessment Officer of the county in which the 10property is located during such period as may be specified by 11the Chief County Assessment Officer. The Chief County 12Assessment Officer in counties of 3,000,000 or more 13inhabitants shall annually give notice of the application 14period by mail or by publication. In counties having less than 153,000,000 inhabitants, beginning with taxable year 1995 and 16thereafter, to receive the exemption, a person shall submit an 17application by July 1 of each taxable year to the Chief County 18Assessment Officer of the county in which the property is 19located. A county may, by ordinance, establish a date for 20submission of applications that is different than July 1. The 21applicant shall submit with the application an affidavit of 22the applicant's total household income, age, marital status 23(and if married the name and address of the applicant's 24spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of members of 25the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The Department 26shall establish, by rule, a method for verifying the accuracy   HB1867- 11 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1of affidavits filed by applicants under this Section, and the 2Chief County Assessment Officer may conduct audits of any 3taxpayer claiming an exemption under this Section to verify 4that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the exemption. Each 5application shall contain or be verified by a written 6declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. A 7taxpayer's signing a fraudulent application under this Act is 8perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal Code of 92012. The applications shall be clearly marked as applications 10for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead 11Exemption and must contain a notice that any taxpayer who 12receives the exemption is subject to an audit by the Chief 13County Assessment Officer.14    Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in 15counties having fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 16applicant fails to file the application required by this 17Section in a timely manner and this failure to file is due to a 18mental or physical condition sufficiently severe so as to 19render the applicant incapable of filing the application in a 20timely manner, the Chief County Assessment Officer may extend 21the filing deadline for a period of 30 days after the applicant 22regains the capability to file the application, but in no case 23may the filing deadline be extended beyond 3 months of the 24original filing deadline. In order to receive the extension 25provided in this paragraph, the applicant shall provide the 26Chief County Assessment Officer with a signed statement from   HB1867- 12 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1the applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 2or physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 3condition, that, in the physician's, advanced practice 4registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 5condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 6incapable of filing the application in a timely manner, and 7the date on which the applicant regained the capability to 8file the application.9    Beginning January 1, 1998, notwithstanding any other 10provision to the contrary, in counties having fewer than 113,000,000 inhabitants, if an applicant fails to file the 12application required by this Section in a timely manner and 13this failure to file is due to a mental or physical condition 14sufficiently severe so as to render the applicant incapable of 15filing the application in a timely manner, the Chief County 16Assessment Officer may extend the filing deadline for a period 17of 3 months. In order to receive the extension provided in this 18paragraph, the applicant shall provide the Chief County 19Assessment Officer with a signed statement from the 20applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 21physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 22condition, and that, in the physician's, advanced practice 23registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 24condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 25incapable of filing the application in a timely manner.26    In counties having less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an   HB1867- 13 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1applicant was denied an exemption in taxable year 1994 and the 2denial occurred due to an error on the part of an assessment 3official, or his or her agent or employee, then beginning in 4taxable year 1997 the applicant's base year, for purposes of 5determining the amount of the exemption, shall be 1993 rather 6than 1994. In addition, in taxable year 1997, the applicant's 7exemption shall also include an amount equal to (i) the amount 8of any exemption denied to the applicant in taxable year 1995 9as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, as the base year, 10(ii) the amount of any exemption denied to the applicant in 11taxable year 1996 as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, 12as the base year, and (iii) the amount of the exemption 13erroneously denied for taxable year 1994.14    For purposes of this Section, a person who will be 65 years 15of age during the current taxable year shall be eligible to 16apply for the homestead exemption during that taxable year. 17Application shall be made during the application period in 18effect for the county of his or her residence. 19    The Chief County Assessment Officer may determine the 20eligibility of a life care facility that qualifies as a 21cooperative to receive the benefits provided by this Section 22by use of an affidavit, application, visual inspection, 23questionnaire, or other reasonable method in order to insure 24that the tax savings resulting from the exemption are credited 25by the management firm to the apportioned tax liability of 26each qualifying resident. The Chief County Assessment Officer   HB1867- 14 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1may request reasonable proof that the management firm has so 2credited that exemption.3    Except as provided in this Section, all information 4received by the chief county assessment officer or the 5Department from applications filed under this Section, or from 6any investigation conducted under the provisions of this 7Section, shall be confidential, except for official purposes 8or pursuant to official procedures for collection of any State 9or local tax or enforcement of any civil or criminal penalty or 10sanction imposed by this Act or by any statute or ordinance 11imposing a State or local tax. Any person who divulges any such 12information in any manner, except in accordance with a proper 13judicial order, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.14    Nothing contained in this Section shall prevent the 15Director or chief county assessment officer from publishing or 16making available reasonable statistics concerning the 17operation of the exemption contained in this Section in which 18the contents of claims are grouped into aggregates in such a 19way that information contained in any individual claim shall 20not be disclosed.21    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for taxable 22year 2017 and thereafter, in counties of 3,000,000 or more 23inhabitants, the amount of the exemption shall be the greater 24of (i) the amount of the exemption otherwise calculated under 25this Section or (ii) $2,000. 26    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each   HB1867- 15 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 2the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 3that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 4year, provided that: 5        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 6    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 7    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 8        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 9    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 10    as of January 1, 2019; 11        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 12    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 13    this Code; and 14        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 15    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 16    taxable years. 17    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 18authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 19audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 20Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 21exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 22    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 23chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 24the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 25that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 26year, if:  HB1867- 16 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 2    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 3    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;4        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 5    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 6    as of January 1, 2020;7        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 8    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 9    this Code; and10        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 11    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 12    taxable years.13    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 14authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 15audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 16Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 17exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 18    (d) Each Chief County Assessment Officer shall annually 19publish a notice of availability of the exemption provided 20under this Section. The notice shall be published at least 60 21days but no more than 75 days prior to the date on which the 22application must be submitted to the Chief County Assessment 23Officer of the county in which the property is located. The 24notice shall appear in a newspaper of general circulation in 25the county.26    Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates   HB1867- 17 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 2implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 3(Source: P.A. 101-635, eff. 6-5-20; 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 4102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 5    Section 10. The Energy Assistance Act is amended by 6changing Section 6 as follows: 7    (305 ILCS 20/6)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 1406)8    Sec. 6. Eligibility, conditions of participation, and 9energy assistance. 10    (a) Any person who is a resident of the State of Illinois 11and whose household income is not greater than an amount 12determined annually by the Department, in consultation with 13the Policy Advisory Council, may apply for assistance pursuant 14to this Act in accordance with regulations promulgated by the 15Department. In setting the annual eligibility level, the 16Department shall consider the amount of available funding. For 17calendar years beginning before January 1, 2026, the 18Department and may not set an eligibility a limit higher than 19150% of the federal nonfarm poverty level as established by 20the federal Office of Management and Budget or 60% of the State 21median income for the current State fiscal year as established 22by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services; except 23that for the period from the effective date of this amendatory 24Act of the 101st General Assembly through June 30, 2021, the   HB1867- 18 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1Department may establish limits not higher than 200% of that 2poverty level. For calendar years beginning on or after 3January 1, 2026, the Department may not set eligibility limits 4that are higher than the greater of:5        (1) 150% of the federal nonfarm poverty level as 6    established by the federal Office of Management and Budget 7    or 60% of the State median income for the current State 8    fiscal year as established by the U.S. Department of 9    Health and Human Services, whichever is higher; or 10        (2) the eligibility limit for the immediately 11    preceding calendar year, increased by the annual cost of 12    living increase, if any, in Social Security and 13    Supplemental Security Income benefits that took effect 14    during the immediately preceding calendar year. 15    The Department, in consultation with the Policy Advisory 16Council, may adjust the percentage of poverty level annually 17in accordance with federal guidelines and based on funding 18availability. 19    (b) Applicants who qualify for assistance pursuant to 20subsection (a) of this Section shall, subject to appropriation 21from the General Assembly and subject to availability of funds 22to the Department, receive energy assistance as provided by 23this Act. The Department, upon receipt of monies authorized 24pursuant to this Act for energy assistance, shall commit funds 25for each qualified applicant in an amount determined by the 26Department. In determining the amounts of assistance to be   HB1867- 19 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1provided to or on behalf of a qualified applicant, the 2Department shall ensure that the highest amounts of assistance 3go to households with the greatest energy costs in relation to 4household income. The Department shall include factors such as 5energy costs, household size, household income, and region of 6the State when determining individual household benefits. In 7setting assistance levels, the Department shall attempt to 8provide assistance to approximately the same number of 9households who participated in the 1991 Residential Energy 10Assistance Partnership Program. Such assistance levels shall 11be adjusted annually on the basis of funding availability and 12energy costs. In promulgating rules for the administration of 13this Section the Department shall assure that a minimum of 1/3 14of funds available for benefits to eligible households with 15the lowest incomes and that elderly households, households 16with children under the age of 6 years old, and households with 17persons with disabilities are offered a priority application 18period.19    (c) If the applicant is not a customer of record of an 20energy provider for energy services or an applicant for such 21service, such applicant shall receive a direct energy 22assistance payment in an amount established by the Department 23for all such applicants under this Act; provided, however, 24that such an applicant must have rental expenses for housing 25greater than 30% of household income.26    (c-1) This subsection shall apply only in cases where: (1)   HB1867- 20 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1the applicant is not a customer of record of an energy provider 2because energy services are provided by the owner of the unit 3as a portion of the rent; (2) the applicant resides in housing 4subsidized or developed with funds provided under the Rental 5Housing Support Program Act or under a similar locally funded 6rent subsidy program, or is the voucher holder who resides in a 7rental unit within the State of Illinois and whose monthly 8rent is subsidized by the tenant-based Housing Choice Voucher 9Program under Section 8 of the U.S. Housing Act of 1937; and 10(3) the rental expenses for housing are no more than 30% of 11household income. In such cases, the household may apply for 12an energy assistance payment under this Act and the owner of 13the housing unit shall cooperate with the applicant by 14providing documentation of the energy costs for that unit. Any 15compensation paid to the energy provider who supplied energy 16services to the household shall be paid on behalf of the owner 17of the housing unit providing energy services to the 18household. The Department shall report annually to the General 19Assembly on the number of households receiving energy 20assistance under this subsection and the cost of such 21assistance. 22    (d) If the applicant is a customer of an energy provider, 23such applicant shall receive energy assistance in an amount 24established by the Department for all such applicants under 25this Act, such amount to be paid by the Department to the 26energy provider supplying winter energy service to such   HB1867- 21 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1applicant. Such applicant shall:2        (i) make all reasonable efforts to apply to any other 3    appropriate source of public energy assistance; and4        (ii) sign a waiver permitting the Department to 5    receive income information from any public or private 6    agency providing income or energy assistance and from any 7    employer, whether public or private.8    (e) Any qualified applicant pursuant to this Section may 9receive or have paid on such applicant's behalf an emergency 10assistance payment to enable such applicant to obtain access 11to winter energy services. Any such payments shall be made in 12accordance with regulations of the Department.13    (f) The Department may, if sufficient funds are available, 14provide additional benefits to certain qualified applicants:15        (i) for the reduction of past due amounts owed to 16    energy providers; 17        (ii) to assist the household in responding to 18    excessively high summer temperatures or energy costs. 19    Households containing elderly members, children, a person 20    with a disability, or a person with a medical need for 21    conditioned air shall receive priority for receipt of such 22    benefits; and23        (iii) for the installation of energy conservation 24    measures, health and safety measures, healthy home 25    measures, home improvement measures to help alleviate 26    deferrals from weatherization activities, and renewable   HB1867- 22 -LRB104 08531 HLH 18583 b1    energy retrofits. 2(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-176, eff. 6-1-22; 3102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-663, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.